Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3031.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 45-53 of the General Laws entitled "Low and Moderate Income
Housing" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
45-53-17. North Providence emergency moratorium.
(a) If the town of North Providence, shall at any time have an aggregate of two hundred
fifty (250) or more units proposed in a comprehensive permit project or projects, the town of North
Providence may enact an emergency moratorium and not accept or process further applications. No
application proposed, offered, submitted or tendered during any moratorium imposed pursuant to
the provisions of this section shall have any grandfathered status.
(b) The town of North Providence, upon adoption of any moratorium in accordance with
the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, may continue to impose the moratorium until such
time as comprehensive permit requirements in § 45-53-4 are amended.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005939
========